Utah statutes.
10-9a-506.   Regulating annexed territory.

(1)  The legislative body of each municipality shall assign a land use zone or a variety thereof to territory annexed to the municipality at the time the territory is annexed.

(2)  If the legislative body fails to assign a land use zone at the time the territory is annexed, all land uses within the annexed territory shall be compatible with surrounding uses within the municipality.

